Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1609.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-462, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-462. Form of paper ballot The ballots for a primary election shall be printed with a different color designation for each political party that is included on the ballot. Unless otherwise provided by law, the ballot shall be printed, "official ballot of the __________ party, primary election (date), ___________ precinct, county (or city or town) of __________, state of Arizona".  The name used to identify each political party on the primary ballot shall be prescribed by sections 16-801 and 16-802.  Below the heading shall be placed the title of each office to be voted for, and an instruction to the voter as to how many are to be voted for for the particular office, thus: "vote for not more than __________" (insert the number to be elected), under which shall be placed alphabetically and alternated, as provided by law, the names of all the party's candidates to be voted for in each precinct of the county or precinct or ward of the city or town for whom nomination papers have been filed for such office, leaving as many blank lines as there are offices under that title to be filled, followed by a place for the voter to make a mark to indicate the voter's choice either to the right or the left of the candidate's name, and of the blank line.  Double or more columns may be arranged on the ballot.  In other respects the ballot shall conform as nearly as possible to the ballot prescribed for general elections. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 16-502, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-502. Form and contents of ballot A. Ballots shall be printed with black ink on white paper of sufficient thickness to prevent the printing thereon from being discernible from the back, and the same type shall be used for the names of all candidates.  The ballots shall be headed "official ballot" in bold-faced plain letters, with a heavy rule above and below the heading.  Immediately below shall be placed the words "type of election, (date of election)" and the name of the county and state in which the election is held.  The name or number of the precinct in which the election is held shall be placed on the ballot in a uniform location for all ballots.  No other matter shall be placed or printed at the head of any ballot. Instructions to the voter on marking the ballot may be printed below the heading as follows: 1. Put a mark according to the instructions next to the name of each candidate for each office for whom you wish to vote. 2. If you wish to vote for a person whose name is not printed on the ballot, write such name in the blank space provided on the ballot and put a mark according to the instructions next to the name so written. 3. Put a mark according to the instructions next to the word "yes" or "for" for each proposition or question you wish to be adopted.  Put a mark according to the instructions next to the word "no" or "against" for each proposition or question you wish not to be adopted. B. Immediately below the ballot instructions shall be placed the following: Section One Partisan Ballot C. Immediately below the heading for section one there shall be placed in columns the names of the candidates of the several political parties. Next to each candidate's name there shall be printed in bold-faced letters the name of the political party, which shall be prescribed by sections 16-801 and 16-802.  At the head of each column shall be printed the names of the offices to be filled with the name of each office being of uniform type size.  At the head of each column shall be printed in the following order the names of candidates for: 1. Presidential electors, which shall be in a list and next to the list shall be printed in bold type the surname of the presidential candidate, and the surname of the vice presidential candidate who is seeking election jointly with the presidential candidate shall be listed directly below the name of the presidential candidate. The indicator for the selection of the presidential and vice presidential candidates shall be directly next to the surname of the presidential candidate, and one mark directly next to a presidential candidate's surname shall be counted as a vote for each elector in the list next to the presidential and vice presidential candidates. 2. United States senator. 3. Representatives in Congress. 4. The several state offices. 5. The several county and precinct offices. D. The names of candidates for the offices of state senator and state representative along with the district number shall be placed within the heading of each column to the right of the office name for state offices and immediately below the candidates for the office of governor.  The number of the supervisorial district of which a candidate is a nominee shall be printed within the heading of each column to the right of the name of the office. E. The lists of the candidates of the several parties shall be arranged with the names of the parties in descending order according to the votes cast for governor for that county in the most recent general election for the office of governor, commencing with the left-hand column.  In the case of political parties that did not have candidates on the ballot in the last general election, such parties shall be listed in alphabetical order below the parties that did have candidates on the ballot in the last general election. The names of all candidates nominated under section 16-341 shall be placed in a single column below that of the recognized parties.  Next to the name of each candidate, in parentheses, shall be printed a three-letter abbreviation that is taken from the three words prescribed in the candidate's certificate of nomination. F. Immediately below the designation of the office to be voted for shall appear the words: "Vote for not more than _________" (insert the number to be elected). G. In each column at the right or left of the name of each candidate and on the same line there shall be a place for the voter to put a mark.  Below the name of the last named candidate for each office there shall be as many blank lines as there are offices of the same title to be filled, with a place for the voter to put a mark.  On the blank line the voter may write the name of any person for whom the voter desires to vote whose name is not printed, and next to the name so written the voter shall designate his choice by a mark as in the case of printed names. H. When there are two or more candidates of the same political party for the same office, or more than one candidate for a judicial office, the names of all such candidates shall be so alternated on the ballots used in each election district that the name of each candidate shall appear substantially an equal number of times in each possible location.  If there are fewer or the same number of candidates seeking office than the number to be elected, the rotation of names is not required and the names shall be placed in alphabetical order. I. Immediately below section one of the ballot shall be placed the following: Section Two Nonpartisan Ballot J. Immediately below the heading for section two shall be placed the names of the candidates for justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior court standing for retention or rejection pursuant to article VI, section 38, Constitution of Arizona, judges of the superior court standing for election pursuant to article VI, section 12, Constitution of Arizona, school district officials and other nonpartisan officials in a column or in columns without partisan or other designation except the title of office in an order determined by the officer in charge of the election. K. Immediately below the offices listed in subsection J of this section, the ballot shall contain a separate heading of any nonpartisan office for a vacant unexpired term and shall include the expiration date of the term of the vacated office. L. All proposed constitutional amendments and other propositions or questions to be submitted to the voters shall be printed immediately below the names of candidates for nonpartisan positions in such order as the secretary of state, or if a city or town election, the city or town clerk, designates. Placement of county and local charter amendments, propositions or questions shall be determined by the officer in charge of the election.  Except as provided by section 19-125, each proposition or question shall be followed by the words "yes" and "no" or "for ______" and "against ______" as the nature of the proposition or question requires, and at the right or left of and next to each of such words shall be a place for the voter to put a mark according to the instructions that is similar in size to those places appearing opposite the names of the candidates, in which the voter may indicate his vote for or against such proposition or question by a mark as defined in section 16-400. M. Instead of printing the official and descriptive titles or the full text of each measure or question on the official ballot, the officer in charge of elections may print phrases on the official ballot that contain all of the following: 1. The number of the measure in reverse type and at least twelve point type. 2. The designation of the measure as prescribed by section 19-125, subsection C or as a question, proposition or charter amendment, followed by the words "relating to..." and inserting the subject. 3. Either the statement prescribed by section 19-125, subsection D that describes the effects of a "yes" vote and a "no" vote or, for other measures, the text of the question or proposition. 4. The words "yes" and "no" or "for" and "against", as may be appropriate and a place for the voter to put a mark. N. For any ballot printed pursuant to subsection M of this section, the instructions on the official ballot shall direct the voter to the full text of the official and descriptive titles and the questions and propositions as printed on the sample ballot and posted in the polling place. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 16-801, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-801. Representation of new party on ballot at primary and general elections A. A new political party may become eligible for recognition and shall be represented by an official party ballot at the next ensuing regular primary election and accorded a column on the official ballot at the succeeding general election on filing with the secretary of state a petition signed by a number of qualified electors equal to not less than one and one-third per cent percent of the total votes cast for governor at the last preceding general election at which a governor was elected.  From this number, at least five different counties shall be included as the county of registration among the required total of qualified electors and at least ten per cent percent of the required total of qualified electors shall be registered in counties with populations of less than five hundred thousand persons. The petition shall: 1. Be verified by the affidavit of ten qualified electors of the state, asking that the signers thereof be recognized as a new political party. The status as qualified electors of the signers of the affidavit shall be certified by the county recorder of the county in which they reside. 2. Be in substantially the form prescribed by section 16-315. 3. Be captioned "petition for political party recognition". 4. Include the proposed political party name, which shall be distinguishable from the name of all existing recognized political parties in this state and which may not contain the word or phrase "unaffiliated", "party not designated", "no party", "no preference", "independent" or "decline to state" or any variation of those words or phrases. B. Notwithstanding any other law, on recognition as a political party that is represented by an official party ballot at the primary election and accorded a ballot column at the succeeding general election, a new political party is entitled to representation as a political party on the official ballot through the next two regularly scheduled general elections for federal office immediately following recognition of the political party.  After these two regularly scheduled general elections for federal office, the political party is ineligible for further representation on the ballot unless it qualifies for continued representation on the ballot as prescribed in section 16-804 or it files a new petition for recognition as a new political party pursuant to this section and section 16-803. C. For all election administration purposes, the secretary of state and all other election officials shall recognize a political party by the name listed on the petition for political party recognition unless the political party subsequently files a legally sufficient new petition for political party recognition pursuant to this section or section 16-802.END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 16-802, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-802. Representation of new party on ballot for county or municipal election A new political party shall become eligible for recognition, shall be represented by an official party ballot at the next ensuing primary election of a county, city or town and shall be placed on the official ballot at the succeeding regular election on filing with the officer in charge of elections of the county or the city or town clerk, as the case may be, a petition that is signed by a number of qualified electors equal to not less than two percent of the votes cast for county attorney in the case of a county petition or for mayor in the case of a city or town petition and that otherwise complies with section 16-801. The county recorder or the city or town clerk, as applicable, shall review the petitions in the same manner prescribed by section 16-803, including the selection of a random sample of twenty percent of the total signatures eligible for verification, which shall be individually verified and certified, and shall perform a calculation and projection of the total number of valid signatures and make a determination whether the party shall be recognized as prescribed by section 16-803, subsection I. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Intent and purpose The legislature intends by this act to reduce voter confusion, prevent erroneous political party affiliation and support the orderly administration of elections. Sec. 6. Retroactivity; notice; compliance A. This act applies retroactively to from and after December 31, 2024. Within five days after the effective date of this act, the secretary of state shall provide notice of this act to all political parties that are recognized pursuant to section 16-801 or 16-802, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act. B. Any political party that is not in compliance with this act shall come into compliance within ten days after the effective date of this act. Sec. 7. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law.